Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,122.01
Gold
Star Family plates; design requirements.

(1) The department
shall design license plates to be known as Gold Star Family plates. The department
shall create designs reflecting support for those who died while serving in
good standing in the United States Armed Forces in consultation with the Department
of Veterans' Affairs and the Military Department. The Department of Veterans'
Affairs shall recommend the design of the plate to the Department of Motor
Vehicles. The design shall be selected on the basis of limiting the manufacturing
cost of each plate to an amount less than or equal to the amount charged for
license plates pursuant to section 60-3,102. The department shall make applications
available for this type of plate when it is designed. The department may adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section and section
60-3,122.02.

(2) One type of Gold Star Family plate shall be consecutively
numbered plates. The department shall:

(a) Number the plates consecutively
beginning with the number one, using numerals the size of which maximizes
legibility and limiting the numerals to five characters or less; and

(b)
Not use a county designation or any characters other than numbers on the plates.

(3)
One type of Gold Star Family plate shall be personalized message plates. Such
plates shall be issued subject to the same conditions specified for personalized
message license plates in section 60-3,118, except that a maximum of five
characters may be used.

Laws
2007, LB570, § 2.